Utah statutes.
53A-2-118.    Creation of new school district -- Initiation of process --
Procedures to be followed.
(1)  A new school district may be created from one or more existing school
districts, as provided in this section.
(2) (a)  The process to create a new school district may be initiated:
(i)  through a citizens' initiative petition;
(ii)  at the request of the board of the existing district or districts to be
affected by the creation of the new district; or
(iii)  at the request of a city within the boundaries of the school district
or at the request of interlocal agreement participants, pursuant to Section
53A-2-118.1.
(b) (i)  Each petition submitted under Subsection (2)(a)(i) shall be signed by
qualified electors residing within the geographical boundaries of the proposed
new school district equal in number to at least 15% of the number of electors
in the area who voted for the office of governor at the last regular general
election.
(ii)  Each request or petition submitted under Subsection (2)(a) shall:
(A)  be filed with the clerk of each county in which any part of the proposed
new school district is located;
(B)  indicate the typed or printed name and current residence address of each
governing board member making a request, or registered voter signing a
petition, as the case may be;
(C)  describe the proposed new school district boundaries; and
(D)  designate up to five signers of the petition or request as sponsors, one
of whom shall be designated as the contact sponsor, with the mailing address
and telephone number of each.
(c)  A signer of a petition under Subsection (2)(a)(i) may withdraw or, once
withdrawn, reinstate the signer's signature at any time before the filing of
the petition by filing a written withdrawal or reinstatement with the county
clerk.
(d)  The process under Subsection (2)(a)(i) may only be initiated once during
any four-year period.
(e)  A new district may not be formed pursuant to Subsection (2)(a) if the
student population of the proposed new district is less than 3,000 or the
existing district's student population would be less than 3,000 because of the
creation of the new school district.
(f)  Within 45 days after the filing of a petition under Subsection (2)(a)(i)
or five business days after the filing of a request under Subsection
(2)(a)(ii) or (iii), the clerk of each county with which a request or petition
is filed shall:
(i)  determine whether the request or petition complies with Subsections
(2)(a), (b), (d), and (e), as applicable; and
(ii) (A)  if the county clerk determines that the request or petition complies
with the applicable requirements:
(I)  certify the request or petition and deliver the certified request or
petition to the county legislative body; and
(II)  mail or deliver written notification of the certification to the contact
sponsor; or
(B)  if the county clerk determines that the request or petition fails to
comply with any of the applicable requirements, reject the request or petition
and notify the contact sponsor in writing of the rejection and reasons for the
rejection.
(g)  If the county clerk fails to certify or reject a request or petition
within the time specified in Subsection (2)(f), the request or petition shall
be considered to be certified.
(h) (i)  If the county clerk rejects a request or petition, the request or
petition may be amended to correct the deficiencies for which it was rejected
and then refiled.
(ii)  Subsection (2)(d) does not apply to a request or petition that is
amended and refiled after having been rejected by a county clerk.
(i)  If a county legislative body receives a request from a school board under
Subsection (2)(a)(ii) or a petition under Subsection (2)(a)(i) which is
certified by the county clerk on or before December 1:
(i)  the county legislative body shall appoint an ad hoc advisory committee,
as provided by Subsection (3), on or before January 1;
(ii)  the ad hoc advisory committee shall submit its report and
recommendations to the county legislative body, as provided by Subsection (3),
on or before July 1; and
(iii)  if the legislative body of each county with which a request or petition
is filed approves a proposal to create a new district, the proposal shall be
submitted to the respective county clerk to be voted on by the electors of
each existing district at the regular general or municipal general election
held in November.
(3) (a)  The legislative body of each county with which a request or petition
is filed shall appoint an ad hoc advisory committee to review and make
recommendations on a request for the creation of a new school district
submitted under Subsection (2)(a)(i) or (ii).
(b)  The advisory committee shall:
(i)  seek input from:
(A)  those requesting the creation of the new school district;
(B)  the school board and school personnel of each existing school district;
(C)  those citizens residing within the geographical boundaries of each
existing school district;
(D)  the State Board of Education; and
(E)  other interested parties;
(ii)  review data and gather information on at least:
(A)  the financial viability of the proposed new school district;
(B)  the proposal's financial impact on each existing school district;
(C)  the exact placement of school district boundaries; and
(D)  the positive and negative effects of creating a new school district and
whether the positive effects outweigh the negative if a new school district
were to be created; and
(iii)  make a report to the county legislative body in a public meeting on the
committee's activities, together with a recommendation on whether to create a
new school district.
(4)  For a request or petition submitted under Subsection (2)(a)(i) or
(2)(a)(ii):
(a)  The county legislative body shall provide for a 45-day public comment
period on the report and recommendation to begin on the day the report is
given under Subsection (3)(b)(iii).
(b)  Within 14 days after the end of the comment period, the legislative body
of each county with which a request or petition is filed shall vote on the
creation of the proposed new school district.
(c)  The proposal is approved if a majority of the members of the legislative
body of each county with which a request or petition is filed votes in favor
of the proposal.
(d)  If the proposal is approved, the legislative body of each county with
which a request or petition is filed shall submit the proposal to the county
clerk to be voted on:
(i)  by the legal voters of each existing school district;
(ii)  in accordance with the procedures and requirements applicable to a
regular general election under Title 20A, Election Code; and
(iii)  at the next regular general election or municipal general election,
whichever is first.
(e)  Creation of the new school district shall occur if a majority of the
electors within both the proposed school district and each remaining school
district voting on the proposal vote in favor of the creation of the new
district.
(f)  Each county legislative body shall comply with the requirements of
Section 53A-2-101.5.
(g)  If a proposal submitted under Subsection (2)(a)(i) or (ii) to create a
new district is approved by the electors, the existing district's documented
costs to study and implement the proposal shall be reimbursed by the new
district.
(5) (a)  If a proposal submitted under Subsection (2)(a)(iii) is certified
under Subsection (2)(f) or (g), the legislative body of each county in which
part of the proposed new school district is located shall submit the proposal
to the respective clerk of each county to be voted on:
(i)  by the legal voters residing within the proposed new school district
boundaries;
(ii)  in accordance with the procedures and requirements applicable to a
regular general election under Title 20A, Election Code; and
(iii)  at the next regular general election or municipal general election,
whichever is first.
(b) (i)  If a majority of the legal voters within the proposed new school
district boundaries voting on the proposal at an election under Subsection
(5)(a) vote in favor of the creation of the new district:
(A)  each county legislative body shall comply with the requirements of
Section 53A-2-101.5; and
(B)  upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of the certificate under Section
67-1a-6.5, the new district is created.
(ii)  Notwithstanding the creation of a new district as provided in Subsection
(5)(b)(i)(B):
(A)  a new school district may not begin to provide educational services to
the area within the new district until July 1 of the second calendar year
following the creation election date;
(B)  a remaining district may not begin to provide educational services to the
area within the remaining district until the time specified in Subsection
(5)(b)(ii)(A); and
(C)  each existing district shall continue, until the time specified in
Subsection (5)(b)(ii)(A), to provide educational services within the entire
area covered by the existing district.
